Illinois, session 104th, HB5166.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Drainage Code is amended by adding 5Section 10-3.5 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 605/10-3.5 new)7    Sec. 10-3.5. Dissolution of drainage districts in a county 8having more than 650,000 but fewer than 1,000,000 inhabitants. 9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Date of dissolution" means the date that a dissolving 11drainage district is dissolved.12    "Dissolving drainage district" means the drainage district 13proposed to be dissolved under this Section.14    "Governing body" includes, but is not limited to, the 15board of a drainage district, the corporate authorities of a 16municipality, the township board of a township, and the county 17board of a county.18    "Receiving unit of local government" means the unit of 19local government receiving the rights, duties, and liabilities 20of the drainage district proposed to be dissolved under this 21Section.22    (b) In addition to other methods of dissolution provided 23in this Code, a drainage district organized under this Code in   HB5166 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19304 RTM 32750 b1a county having more than 650,000 but fewer than 1,000,000 2inhabitants shall be dissolved upon the affirmative vote of:3        (1) a majority of the governing body of the dissolving 4    drainage district to dissolve the drainage district on a 5    specified date of dissolution and transfer the drainage 6    district's rights, duties, and liabilities to a receiving 7    unit of local government on or before a specified date of 8    dissolution; and9        (2) a majority of the governing body of the receiving 10    unit of local government to receive the rights, duties, 11    and liabilities of the dissolving drainage district on or 12    before a specified date of dissolution.13    (c) On or before the date of dissolution, all real and 14personal property, and any other assets, together with all 15personnel, contractual obligations, and liabilities of the 16dissolving drainage district shall be transferred to the 17receiving unit of local government.18    (d) On the date of dissolution, the dissolving drainage 19district is dissolved.20    (e) On and after the date of dissolution, all rights and 21duties of the dissolving drainage district may be exercised by 22the receiving unit of local government.23    (f) Before the date of dissolution, the receiving unit of 24local government shall submit a service continuation plan 25confirming that the receiving unit of local government has the 26resources to continue providing the services provided by the   HB5166 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19304 RTM 32750 b1dissolving drainage district.2    (g) In addition to the requirements of any other law 3providing for the discontinuation or change to a tax imposed 4within a special district, within 30 days of the date of 5dissolution of the dissolving drainage district, the 6dissolving drainage district must provide to the Department of 7Revenue and the county or counties in which property is 8located and in which taxes are levied or extended by or for the 9dissolving drainage district a certified copy of the ordinance 10or resolution adopted by the governing body of the dissolving 11drainage district that dissolved the dissolving drainage 12district and transferred the dissolving drainage district's 13rights, duties, and liabilities to a receiving unit of local 14government.15    (h) In addition to the requirements of any other law 16providing for the discontinuation or change to a tax imposed 17within a special district, within 30 days of the date that a 18receiving unit of local government will receive the rights, 19duties, and liabilities of a dissolving drainage district, the 20receiving unit of local government must provide to the 21Department of Revenue and the county or counties in which 22property is located and in which taxes are levied or extended 23by or for the dissolving drainage district a certified copy of 24the ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of 25the receiving unit of local government that approved of the 26receipt, acceptance, and assumption of the rights, duties, and   HB5166 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19304 RTM 32750 b1liabilities of the dissolving drainage district. 2    Section 10. The Sanitary District Act of 1936 is amended 3by adding Section 33.2 as follows: 4    (70 ILCS 2805/33.2 new)5    Sec. 33.2. Dissolution of sanitary districts in a county 6having more than 650,000 but fewer than 1,000,000 inhabitants.7    (a) As used in this Section:8    "Date of dissolution" means the date that a dissolving 9sanitary district is dissolved.10    "Dissolving sanitary district" means the sanitary district 11proposed to be dissolved under this Section.12    "Governing body" includes, but is not limited to, the 13board of a sanitary district, the corporate authorities of a 14municipality, the township board of a township, and the county 15board of a county.16    "Receiving unit of local government" means the unit of 17local government receiving the rights, duties, and liabilities 18of the sanitary district proposed to be dissolved under this 19Section.20    (b) In addition to other methods of dissolution provided 21in this Act, a sanitary district organized under this Act in a 22county having more than 650,000 but fewer than 1,000,000 23inhabitants shall be dissolved upon the affirmative vote of:24        (1) a majority of the governing body of the dissolving   HB5166 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19304 RTM 32750 b1    sanitary district to dissolve the sanitary district on a 2    specified date of dissolution and transfer the sanitary 3    district's rights, duties, and liabilities to a receiving 4    unit of local government on or before a specified date of 5    dissolution; and6        (2) a majority of the governing body of the receiving 7    unit of local government to receive the rights, duties, 8    and liabilities of the dissolving sanitary district on or 9    before a specified date of dissolution.10    (c) On or before the date of dissolution, all real and 11personal property, and any other assets, together with all 12personnel, contractual obligations, and liabilities of the 13dissolving sanitary district shall be transferred to the 14receiving unit of local government.15    (d) On the date of dissolution, the dissolving sanitary 16district is dissolved.17    (e) On and after the date of dissolution, all rights and 18duties of the dissolving sanitary district may be exercised by 19the receiving unit of local government.20    (f) Before the date of dissolution, the receiving unit of 21local government shall submit a service continuation plan 22confirming that the receiving unit of local government has the 23resources to continue providing the services provided by the 24dissolving sanitary district.25    (g) In addition to the requirements of any other law 26providing for the discontinuation or change to a tax imposed   HB5166 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19304 RTM 32750 b1within a special district, within 30 days of the date of 2dissolution of the dissolving sanitary district, the 3dissolving sanitary district must provide to the Department of 4Revenue and the county or counties in which property is 5located and in which taxes are levied or extended by or for the 6dissolving sanitary district a certified copy of the ordinance 7or resolution adopted by the governing body of the dissolving 8sanitary district that dissolved the dissolving sanitary 9district and transferred the dissolving sanitary district's 10rights, duties, and liabilities to a receiving unit of local 11government.12    (h) In addition to the requirements of any other law 13providing for the discontinuation or change to a tax imposed 14within a special district, within 30 days of the date that a 15receiving unit of local government will receive the rights, 16duties, and liabilities of a dissolving sanitary district, the 17receiving unit of local government must provide to the 18Department of Revenue and the county or counties in which 19property is located and in which taxes are levied or extended 20by or for the dissolving sanitary district a certified copy of 21the ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of 22the receiving unit of local government that approved of the 23receipt, acceptance, and assumption of the rights, duties, and 24liabilities of the dissolving sanitary district. 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.